Missouri, session 2026, SB1729.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 160.572, RSMo, is repealed and two new
sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections
160.572 and 173.1360, to read as follows:
160.572. 1. For purposes of this section, the
following terms shall mean:
(1) ["ACT assessment", the ACT assessment or the ACT
Plus Writing assessment;
(2)] "High school", a public school, not including a
charter school, that provides instruction to students in any
combinations of grades nine, ten, eleven, or twelve;
(2) "WorkKeys", the ACT WorkKeys assessments required
for the National Career Readiness Certificate.
2. [(1) In any school year in which the department of
elementary and secondary education directs a state-funded
census administration of the ACT assessment to any group of
students, any student who would be allowed or required to
participate in the census administration shall receive the
opportunity, on any date within three months before the
census administration, to participate in a state-funded
administration of WorkKeys.
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1729 2
(2) Any student who participated in a state-funded
administration of WorkKeys as described under subdivision
(1) of this subsection shall not participate in any state-
funded census administration of the ACT assessment.
(3) The department of elementary and secondary
education shall not require school districts or charter
schools to administer the ACT assessment to any student who
participated in a state-funded administration of WorkKeys as
described under subdivision (1) of this subsection] Each
high school shall administer college and career readiness
assessments, including a career readiness assessment that
leads to a nationally recognized work readiness certificate,
in a manner and frequency prescribed by the state board of
education to each student before the student graduates from
high school.
3. [(1) In any school year in which a school district
directs the administration of the ACT assessment to any
group of its students to be funded by the district, any
student who would be allowed or required to participate in
the district-funded administration shall receive the
opportunity, on any date within three months before the
administration, to participate in an administration of
WorkKeys funded by the school district.
(2) Nothing in this section shall require a school
district to fund the administration of the ACT assessment to
any student who participated in a district-funded
administration of WorkKeys as described under subdivision
(1) of this subsection] A career readiness assessment under
subsection 2 of this section may include WorkKeys.
4. A public school district may offer additional
college and career readiness assessments for students

SB 1729 3
enrolled in high school, at no cost to the student, by using
funds appropriated by the general assembly for such purpose.
5. The state board of education shall promulgate rules
to implement the provisions of this section. Any rule or
portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section
536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in
this section shall become effective only if it complies with
and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and,
if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter
536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with
the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to
delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule
are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of
rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after
August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
173.1360. Each public institution of higher education
may adopt and implement a policy to use a Platinum, Gold, or
Silver credential earned through the ACT WorkKeys National
Career Readiness Certificate (NCRC) as transcribable credit
toward the attainment of a postsecondary technical degree as
recommended by the American Council on Education (ACE)
national guide.
✓